

Trump signed Executive Order 13769, the "travel ban," on Friday, January 27th, 2017. The Executive Order suspended the U.S. Refugee Admissions Program for 120 days, suspended the admission of Syrian refugees indefinitely, and, most notably, blocked entry of all travel into the United States of non-citizens from Iran, Iraq, Libya, Somalia, Sudan, Syria, and Yemen (with minor exceptions) for 90 days. Trump signed the order to be effective immediately with little warning, notably without clear direction to officials and officers responsible for implementing the ban in the DHS, and without notifying lawyers who would be responsible for defending the ban in court at DOJ. The ban led to chaos, confusion, and legal challenges almost as soon as it was signed. On Monday, January 30th, Trump fired acting attorney general Sally Yates a few hours after she directed the DOJ not to defend the ban in court.




Four questions are important in this event:  why rush rollout? why chaos?  why fire yates? [TODO: write this part better]


The account of Trump and his administration is this:

[TODO: make clear that this is me summarizing what Trump has said]


[want to make clear here: these four questions are important, Trump has his own answers]

Many terror attacks in the U.S. have been carried about by people born in foreign countries, and the seven countries named in the Executive Order are sources of terror. The problem of terrorist attacks by the foreign-born is so dire that a 90-day ban entry of foreign nationals from the countries named in the Executive Order is needed until the U.S. can figure out how to vet these people for ties to terrorism or attitudes and beliefs conducive to terrorism. Although this may be unpleasant, it is necessary and urgent for national security:


https://www.c-span.org/video/?c4653208/president-trump-signs-travel-ban-executive-order
	Trump: I'm establishing new vetting measures to keep radical Islamic terrorists out of the United States of America. We don't want them here. We want to ensure we are not admitting into our country the very threats our soldiers are fighting overseas. We only want to admit those into our country who will support our country and love, deeply, our people.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/827865957750161408
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Feb 4

	Interesting that certain Middle-Eastern countries agree with the ban. They know if certain people are allowed in it's death & destruction!


https://www.whitehouse.gov/presidential-actions/executive-order-protecting-nation-foreign-terrorist-entry-united-states/
	Executive Order Protecting the Nation from Foreign Terrorist Entry into the United States

	...Numerous foreign-born individuals have been convicted or implicated in terrorism-related crimes since September 11, 2001, including foreign nationals who entered the United States after receiving visitor, student, or employment visas, or who entered through the United States refugee resettlement program. Deteriorating conditions in certain countries due to war, strife, disaster, and civil unrest increase the likelihood that terrorists will use any means possible to enter the United States. The United States must be vigilant during the visa-issuance process to ensure that those approved for admission do not intend to harm Americans and that they have no ties to terrorism.

	In order to protect Americans, the United States must ensure that those admitted to this country do not bear hostile attitudes toward it and its founding principles.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/825692045532618753
	Donald J. Trump
	Jan 29

	Our country needs strong borders and extreme vetting, NOW. Look what is happening all over Europe and, indeed, the world - a horrible mess!


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	Feburary 7, 2017

	...Two States challenged the Executive Order as unconstitutional and violative of federal law, and a federal district court preliminarily ruled in their favor and temporarily enjoined enforcement of the Executive Order. The Government now moves for an emergency stay of the district court’s temporary restraining order while its appeal of that order proceeds.

	...the Government has argued that emergency relief is necessary to support its efforts to prevent terrorism


https://www.facebook.com/DonaldTrump/posts/10158567643610725
	Donald J. Trump
	January 29

	Statement Regarding Recent Executive Order Concerning Extreme Vetting

	...America is a proud nation of immigrants and we will continue to show compassion to those fleeing oppression, but we will do so while protecting our own citizens and border.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826044059647107073
	Donald J. Trump
	Jan 30

	There is nothing nice about searching for terrorists before they can enter our country. This was a big part of my campaign. Study the world!


It is necessary to implement the ban without warning--otherwise, potential terrorist would realize the window to travel to the country is closing, and would rush in before the ban is enacted. Were this to happen, it would be a time of great peril for our country:


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...Now, what I wanted to do was do the exact same executive order, but said one thing. I said this to my people. Give them a one-month period of time. But Gen. Kelly, now Sec. Kelly, said if you do that, all these people will come in and (inaudible) the bad ones.

	You do agree there are bad people out there, right? That not everybody that's like you. You have some bad people out there.

	Kelly said you can't do that. And he was right. As soon as he said it I said wow, never thought of it. I said how about one week? He said no good. You got to do it immediately because if you do it immediately they don't have time to come in.

	Now nobody ever reports that. But that's why we did it quickly.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826060143825666051
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Jan 30

	If the ban were announced with a one week notice, the "bad" would rush into our country during that week. A lot of bad "dudes" out there!


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/827996357252243456
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Feb 4

	Because the ban was lifted by a judge, many very bad and dangerous people may be pouring into our country. A terrible decision


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a5mFBHJKfwE&t=8m15s
	And you know, this is a very dangerous period of time because while everybody is talking and dealing, a lot of bad people are thinking about, hey, let's go in right now.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/828342202174668800
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Feb 5

	Just cannot  believe a judge would put our country in such peril. If something happens blame him and court system. People pouring in. Bad!


Even with such short notice, the travel ban had an excellent rollout. There reports of chaos and confusion have some credibility, but this was caused by computer problems with Delta Airlines, the court decisions, protesters at the airports, and grand-standing by Chuck Schumer:


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	Feb 16 2017

	QUESTION: On the travel ban -- we could banter back and forth. On the travel ban would you accept that that was a good example of the smooth running of government...

	TRUMP: Yeah, I do. I do. Let me tell you about this government...

	QUESTION: Were there any mistakes...

	TRUMP: Wait. Wait. I know who you are. Just wait.

	Let me tell you about the travel ban. We had a very smooth rollout of the travel ban. But we had a bad court. Got a bad decision. We had a court that's been overturned. Again, may be wrong. But I think it's 80 percent of the time, a lot.

	We had a bad decision. We're going to keep going with that decision. We're going to put in a new executive order next week some time. But we had a bad decision.

	That's the other thing that was wrong with the travel ban. You had Delta with a massive problem with their computer system at the airports. You had some people that were put out there, brought by very nice busses, and they were put out at various locations.

	Despite that the only problem that we had is we had a bad court. We had a court that gave us what I consider to be, with great respect, a very bad decision. Very bad for the safety and security of our country. The rollout was perfect.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826041397232943104

https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826042483155013632
	Donald J. Trump
	Jan 30

	Only 109 people out of 325,000 were detained and held for questioning. Big problems at airports were caused by Delta computer outage, protesters and the tears of Senator Schumer. Secretary Kelly said that all is going well with very few problems. MAKE AMERICA SAFE AGAIN!


Acting Attorney General Sally Yates was fired for ordering the DOJ not to defend the travel ban. In doing this, she had jeopardized national security and betrayed the department of justice:


https://www.whitehouse.gov/briefings-statements/statement-appointment-dana-boente-acting-attorney-general/
	The acting Attorney General, Sally Yates, has betrayed the Department of Justice by refusing to enforce a legal order designed to protect the citizens of the United States. This order was approved as to form and legality by the Department of Justice Office of Legal Counsel.

	Ms. Yates is an Obama Administration appointee who is weak on borders and very weak on illegal immigration.

	It is time to get serious about protecting our country. Calling for tougher vetting for individuals travelling from seven dangerous places is not extreme. It is reasonable and necessary to protect our country.

	Tonight, President Trump relieved Ms. Yates of her duties



What actually happened:

...


Trump's travel ban, in it's various forms, had faced legal scrutiny since the start of his campaign. Trump initially called for a "complete shutdown of Muslims entering the United States," and defended this idea by saying there's something wrong with Islam and that "Islam hates us:"


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
	Dec. 7, 2015

	Trump speaking during a press conference:

	    "Donald J. Trump is calling for a total and complete shutdown of Muslims entering the United States until our country’s representatives can figure out what the hell is going on."

	Dec. 8, 2015

	Trump speaking on MSNBC:

	    "It’s not unconstitutional keeping people out, frankly, and until we get a hold of what’s going on. And then if you look at Franklin Roosevelt, a respected president, highly respected. Take a look at presidential proclamations back a long time ago ... what he was doing with Germans, Italians, and Japanese, because he had to do it. Because look, we are at war with radical Islam."


http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2011/03/30/donald-trump-sits-down-bill-oreilly.html
	O'REILLY: ...Is there a Muslim problem in the world?

	TRUMP: Absolutely. Absolutely. I don't notice Swedish people knocking down the World Trade Center.

	...O'REILLY: But you do believe overall there is a Muslim problem in the world.

	TRUMP: Well, there is a Muslim problem. Absolutely. You just have to turn on your television set.

	O'REILLY: And do you think it encompasses all Muslims?

	TRUMP: No. And that's the sad part about life. Because you have fabulous Muslims. I know many Muslims and they're fabulous people. They're smart. They're industrious. They're great. Unfortunately, at this moment in time, there is a Muslim problem in the world. And by the way, and you know it and it I know it and some people don't like saying it because they think it's not politically correct.

	O'REILLY: …why don't they, the Muslim community throughout the world, speak out more forcefully against the jihadists?

	TRUMP: Well, there is something out there that brings a level of hostility that I have never seen in any religion. I mean, you can say what you want about the Koran. You can say what you want, but there's something there. There is tremendous hatred and tremendous hatred of us. I look at Iraq. I was watching the other day, you know, we have spent all this money and all those lives in Iraq. They hate us. They hate us. They can't get rid of us fast enough.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
	March 9, 2016

	Trump speaking on CNN:

	    "I think Islam hates us."


The "Muslim ban" proposal was highly controversial and led to immediate backlash from the press, officials, and legal experts, who pointed out that making a law that favors one religion over another is unconstitutional, and denying travel to U.S. residents would violate their due process rights:


http://www.msnbc.com/msnbc/trump-anti-muslim-proposal-probably-illegal
	Constitutional scholars: Trump’s anti-Muslim immigration proposal is probably illegal

	...“I believe Trump’s unprecedented proposal would violate our Constitution,” said Harvard Law Professor Laurence Tribe, “both the First Amendment’s Religion Clauses and the equality dimension of the Due Process Clause of the Fifth Amendment.” 


https://www.cnbc.com/2016/03/30/trumps-muslim-ban-unconstitutional-foreign-affairs-chairman.html
	Trump's Muslim ban unconstitutional: Foreign affairs chairman

	..."I think the thought we could have a religious test [for entrants] would be unconstitutional," said the California Republican, whose district includes parts of San Bernardino County, which suffered a deadly terrorist attack in December.


https://www.freep.com/story/news/politics/2016/06/18/donald-trump-muslim-immigration-ban/86038940/
	Depending how far a President Trump might take such a policy, however, there could be legal questions: If he tried, for instance, to keep permanent legal residents in the U.S. from re-entering while traveling abroad, they could invoke due process rights to challenge it.


https://www.nytimes.com/politics/first-draft/2015/12/07/donald-trump-calls-for-banning-muslims-from-entering-u-s/
	Should Congress enact such a law, he predicted, the Supreme Court would invalidate it as an overly restrictive immigration policy under the equal protection clause of the 14th Amendment.

	“It would certainly be challenged as unconstitutional,” he said. “And I predict the Supreme Court would strike it down.”


https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/2016-election/trump-defends-muslim-ban-common-sense-n476086
	Donald Trump Defends Muslim Ban as ‘Common Sense’


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/experts-trumps-muslim-entry-ban-idea-ridiculous-unconsitutional/2015/12/07/d44a970a-9d47-11e5-bce4-708fe33e3288_story.html
	Experts: Trump’s Muslim entry ban idea ‘ridiculous,’ ‘unconstitutional’ 

	Donald Trump’s proposal to bar all Muslims from entering the United States violates U.S. and international law and would never be allowed by the courts, legal scholars said late Monday.

	“Oh, for the love of God,” said Jonathan Turley, a constitutional law expert at George Washington University. 


In response to this backlash, Trump started making fewer statements about a ban on Muslims and instead starting saying he planned to ban travel from certain territories:


https://cases.justia.com/federal/district-courts/virginia/vaedce/1:2017cv00116/358386/111/0.pdf?ts=1487078541
	As the campaign proceeded, there were fewer references to an outright ban on Muslim immigration, with the focus switched to a ban on persons from territories that have a Muslim majority. Mr. Trump and then-vice-presidential candidate Mike Pence ("Pence") were asked about this evolution in an interview with Lesley Stahl ("Stahl") on July 17, 2016. The relevant portion reads:

		Stahl: [I]n December, you [i.e. Pence] tweeted, and I quote, "Calls to ban Muslims from entering the U.S are offensive and unconstitutional."

		Trump: So you call it territories. OK? We're gonna do territories. We're not gonna let people come in from Syria that nobody knows who they are.

		...

		Stahl: [S]o you're changing ... your position.

		Trump: --No, I--call it whatever you want. We'll call it territories, OK?

		Stahl: So not Muslims?

		Trump: You know--the Constitution--there's nothing like it. But it doesn't necessarily give us the right to commit suicide as a country, OK? And I'll tell you this. Call it whatever you want, change territories [sic], but there are territories and terror states and terror nations that we're not gonna allow the people to come into our country.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
	Oct. 9, 2016

	Trump speaking during the second presidential debate in St. Louis:

    	"The Muslim ban is something that in some form has morphed into a(n) extreme vetting from certain areas of the world."


    Dec. 22, 2016

	Trump when asked whether recent violence in Europe had affected his plans to ban Muslims:

    	"You know my plans. All along, I've been proven to be right. 100% correct. What's happening is disgraceful."


https://www.nbcnews.com/meet-the-press/meet-press-july-24-2016-n615706
	CHUCK TODD: The Muslim ban. I think you've pulled back from it, but you tell me.

	(BEGIN TAPE)

	DONALD TRUMP: We must immediately suspend immigration from any nation that has been compromised by terrorism until such time as proven vetting mechanisms have been put in place.

	(END TAPE)

	CHUCK TODD: This feels like a slight rollback--

	DONALD TRUMP: I don't think that's--

	CHUCK TODD: Should it be interpreted--

	DONALD TRUMP: I don't think so. I actually don't think it's a rollback. In fact, you could say it's an expansion. I'm looking now at territories. People were so upset when I used the word Muslim. Oh, you can't use the word Muslim. Remember this. And I'm okay with that, because I'm talking territory instead of Muslim.

	But just remember this: Our Constitution is great. But it doesn't necessarily give us the right to commit suicide, okay? Now, we have a religious, you know, everybody wants to be protected. And that's great. And that's the wonderful part of our Constitution. I view it differently.


Trump said his plans for a Muslim ban hadn't changed, but he's now framing it differently: instead of a ban on Muslims, it's a ban on travel from dangerous territories. [According](http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/316726-giuliani-trump-asked-me-how-to-do-a-muslim-ban-legally
) to Trump surrogate Rudy Giuliani, Trump arrived at this solution after asking his team "the right way" to do a Muslim ban "legally." In his public statements on this shift, Trump implied that he was aware of the constitutional problems with his ban, but believes national security is more important.

It is unclear if Trump understood the potential constitutional issues with his ban for violating due process rights of U.S. residents; nonetheless, he addressed the issue of whether or not the ban would apply to residents during his campaign. Trump again made shifting statements, first saying the ban will apply to American Muslims abroad, then clarifying it will not apply to U.S. citizens and residents:


http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/presidential-races/262348-trump-calls-for-shutdown-of-muslims-entering-us
	Trump, in a formal statement from his campaign, urged a “total and complete shutdown” of all federal processes allowing followers of Islam into the country until elected leaders can “figure out what is going on.”

	Asked by The Hill whether that would include American Muslims currently abroad, Trump spokeswoman Hope Hicks replied over email: “Mr. Trump says, ‘everyone.’ ”

	During a Tuesday morning interview with ABC's "Good Morning America," however, Trump clarified that American Muslims would still be able to travel freely under his plan.

	"If a person is a Muslim and goes overseas and come back, they can come back. They are a citizen, that is different," Trump said. 


http://transcripts.cnn.com/TRANSCRIPTS/1512/07/cnnt.01.html
	LEMON: So, he did say all Muslims, right, entering, but he didn't clarify on Fox. He said that to The Hill but later clarified on Fox. Take a listen.

	(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP) 

	GRETA VAN SUSTEREN, FOX'S ON THE RECORD SHOW HOST: There are Americans serving in our military who are Muslims who are overseas on bases. Do you apply this rule to them?

	TRUMP: No. They would come home. They would be able to -- anybody here stays, but we have to be very vigilant. There are a lot of bad things going on. When you look at these polling numbers that came out, there is tremendous hatred, there is tremendous animosity.

	And that's -- this have taken of people living in our country, from Muslims living in our country, which is amazing. Because I have Muslim friends, Greta, and they're wonderful people. But there's a tremendous section and cross-section of Muslims living in our country who have tremendous animosity. We can't let this happen. We have a country to protect.

	SUSTEREN: Does it apply to your friends? This is apply to your Muslim friends, this...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: No. Of course...

	SUSTEREN: ... complete shutdown?

	TRUMP: ... this applies, this does not apply to people living in the country except that we have to be vigilant.


These two legal problems, whether or not the ban violated constitutional protections against religious discrimination and whether or not it violated constitutional protections of due process for U.S. residents, would later prove critical for the legal fight to keep the ban alive in courts. For the former, legal challenges focused on intent: was the ban, despite being religiously neutral on its face, meant to discriminate for or against a particular religion? For the latter, legal challenges were based on the impact the ban had on travelers: were travelers who were detained or prevented from boarding their flights given adequate notice and opportunity to respond?

On these points, things were by all accounts things were legally stacked against Trump's travel ban. As a district court would later point out, it is "well established" that courts can look at evidence beyond the face of a law to make judgements on it's constiutionality, and Trump's public statements during the campaign made it hard to argue the travel ban wasn't intended to be a Muslim ban:


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	...It is well established that evidence of purpose beyond the face of the challenged law may be considered in evaluating Establishment and Equal Protection Clause claims. See, e.g., Church of the Lukumi Babalu Aye, Inc. v. City of Hialeah, 508 U.S. 520, 534 (1993) (“The Free Exercise Clause, like the Establishment Clause, extends beyond facial discrimination. . . . Official action that targets religious conduct for distinctive treatment cannot be shielded by mere compliance with the requirement of facial neutrality.”); Larson, 456 U.S. at 254-55 (holding that a facially neutral statute violated the Establishment Clause in light of legislative history demonstrating an intent to apply regulations only to minority religions); Village of Arlington Heights v. Metro. Housing Dev. Corp., 429 U.S. 252, 266-68 (1977) (explaining that circumstantial evidence of intent, including the historical background of the decision and statements by decisionmakers, may be considered in evaluating whether a governmental action was motivated by a discriminatory purpose).


The executive order as written applied to residents with a visa and lawful permanent residents ("green card" holders), and there is a clear legal precedent for protecting these persons due process rights. Immigration statutes and the Supreme Court make explicit that returning lawful permanent residents have due process rights:


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	...The Fifth Amendment of the Constitution prohibits the Government from depriving individuals of their “life, liberty, or property, without due process of law.” U.S. Const. amend. V. The Government may not deprive a person of one of these protected interests without providing “notice and an opportunity to respond,” or, in other words, the opportunity to present reasons not to proceed with the deprivation and have them considered. United States v. Raya-Vaca, 771 F.3d 1195, 1204 (9th Cir. 2014); accordCleveland Bd. of Educ. v. Loudermill, 470 U.S. 532, 542 (1985); ASSE Int’l, Inc. v. Kerry, 803 F.3d 1059, 1073 (9th Cir. 2015). 

	...due process requires [sic] notice and a hearing prior to restricting an individual’s ability to travel. ...See id.(“[T]he returning resident alien is entitled as a matter of due process to a hearing on the charges underlying any attempt to exclude him.” (quoting Rosenberg v. Fleuti, 374 U.S. 449, 460 (1963))).

	...The procedural protections provided by the Fifth Amendment’s Due Process Clause are not limited to citizens. Rather, they “appl[y] to all ‘persons’ within the United States, including aliens,” regardless of “whether their presence here is lawful, unlawful, temporary, or permanent.” Zadvydas v. Davis, 533 U.S. 678, 693 (2001). These rights also apply to certain aliens attempting to reenter the United States after travelling abroad. Landon v. Plasencia, 459 U.S. 21, 33-34 (1982).


http://www.scotusblog.com/2012/01/argument-preview-the-rights-of-lawful-permanent-residents-returning-to-the-u-s/
	The Supreme Court soon will again turn its gaze to a complex immigration case involving a long-term lawful permanent resident of the United States facing deportation.  Just last December, the Court in Judulang v. Holder rejected as arbitrary and capricious the ruling of the Board of Immigration Appeals that a lawful permanent resident convicted of a crime was not eligible for relief from deportation.  On January 18, in Vartelas v. Holder the Court will hear oral arguments in a removal case that raises an issue that has confounded the courts, namely, how the immigration laws and the U.S. Constitution apply to lawful permanent residents (i.e., legal immigrants) who leave the United States and then return.

	...The courts, including the Supreme Court, when addressing the case of a noncitizen who fails to fit neatly into the established legal categories, such as when a lawful permanent resident who has lived in the United States for many years — and thus has significant community ties – travels outside the country and seeks to return.  Given the ties that these lawful permanent residents generally have to the community, courts frequently have been reluctant to impose on them the stricter rules applicable to initial entrants.

	...In Rosenberg v. Fleuti (1963) a lawful permanent resident from Switzerland visited Mexico for a few hours and, upon his return, was charged with being excludable because he had committed a “crime involving moral turpitude” before he left the country; the U.S. government later claimed that he was also excludable because he was homosexual.  To avoid a harsh result, as well as to avoid deciding difficult constitutional questions, the Supreme Court interpreted the immigration statute to mean that Fleuti’s “innocent, casual, and brief” departure from the United States was not “meaningfully interruptive” of his lawful permanent residence and thus he was not seeking “entry” (and thus admission) into the country.  Under the Court’s reasoning, Fleuti therefore could not be denied admission on the exclusion grounds applicable to initial entrants.

	...In 1996, Congress added Section 101(a)(13)(C)(v) to the INA.  That statute provides that a lawful permanent resident who returns from a trip out of the United States “shall not be regarded as seeking an admission” unless he “has committed an offense identified in” Section 212(a)(2) of the INA, which includes crimes involving moral turpitude.  The change in the law helped lawful permanent residents without criminal convictions who traveled abroad because it did not treat them as seeking admission (and thus like initial entrants subject to the inadmissibility grounds).


Any lawful resident stranded, detained, or sent back due to the executive order would therefore have a strong case to challenge the ban on constitutional grounds.

This point would prove to be crucial for the survival of the ban in the courts. First, in the U.S., any law (such as Trump's executive order) cannot be challenged on constitutional grounds unless a plaintiff can demonstrate he or she has "standing"--that the plaintiff has or will suffer immediate, concrete harm traceable to the law:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Standing_(law)
	In law, standing or locus standi is the term for the ability of a party to demonstrate to the court sufficient connection to and harm from the law or action challenged to support that party's participation in the case.

	...In the United States, the current doctrine is that a person cannot bring a suit challenging the constitutionality of a law unless the plaintiff can demonstrate that he/she/it is or will "imminently" be harmed by the law. Otherwise, the court will rule that the plaintiff "lacks standing" to bring the suit, and will dismiss the case without considering the merits of the claim of unconstitutionality. To have a court declare a law unconstitutional, there must be a valid reason for the lawsuit. The party suing must have something to lose in order to sue unless it has automatic standing by action of law.


https://law.justia.com/constitution/us/article-3/20-substantial-interest-standing.html
	“The fundamental aspect of standing is that it focuses on the party seeking to get his complaint before a federal court and not on the issues he wishes to have adjudicated.” The “gist of the question of standing” is whether the party seeking relief has “alleged such a personal stake in the outcome of the controversy as to assure that concrete adverseness which sharpens the presentation of issues upon which the court so largely depends for illumination of difficult constitutional questions.”

	...the Court has been hesitant to assume jurisdiction over matters in which the plaintiff seeking relief cannot articulate a concrete harm. For example, in Laird v. Tatum, the Court held that plaintiffs challenging a domestic surveillance program lacked standing when their alleged injury stemmed from a “subjective chill,” as opposed to a “claim of specific present objective harm or a threat of specific future harm.” And in Spokeo, Inc. v. Robins, the Court explained that a concrete injury requires that an injury must “actually exist” or there must be a “risk of real harm,” such that a plaintiff who alleges nothing more than a bare procedural violation of a federal statute cannot satisfy the injury-in-fact requirement.


If even one traveler were inconvenienced in a way that violated their constitutional rights, the ban would eventually be struck down. For the Trump administration, arguing visa-holders don't have Constitutional rights would be a gamble, but trying the same for lawful permanent residents would be all but impossible. To ensure the ban's survival, the Trump administration would to make sure not even a single lawful permanent resident were barred from travel.

Second, if the ban could be shown to have caused irreparable harm to those affected, the courts would be able to quickly stop the enforcement of the ban, albeit temporarily, with a "Temporary Restraining Order" (TRO):


https://legal-dictionary.thefreedictionary.com/Temporary+Restraining+Order
	A Temporary Restraining Order (TRO) is a court order of limited duration. A TRO commands the parties in the case to maintain a certain status until the court can hear further evidence and decide whether to issue a preliminary injunction.

	Under federal and state rules of Civil Procedure, a person may obtain a TRO by visiting a judge or magistrate without notice to, or the presence of, the adverse party. A TRO may be issued by a court only if (1) it appears from specific facts shown in a signed, sworn Affidavit or complaint that immediate irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the applicant before the adverse party or the adverse party's attorney can be heard in opposition; and (2) the applicant's attorney describes to the court in writing the efforts, if any, that have been made to give notice to the adverse party and gives reasons to support the claim that notice should not be required.

	...The immediate potential for irreparable harm is the gravamen of the TRO. If an applicant is unable to prove that the harm suffered will be irreparable or that the irreparable harm is imminent, a court will not approve a TRO.


https://law.yale.edu/system/files/area/clinic/document/2017.01.28_emergency_motion_for_stay.pdf
	HAMEED KHALID DARWEESH, et al., Plaintiffs, - versus - DONALD TRUMP, et al., Defendants

	January 28, 2017

	TRANSCRIPT OF CIVIL CAUSE FOR EMERGENCY MOTIONFOR STAY OF REMOVAL BEFORE THE HONORABLE ANN M. DONNELLYUNITED STATES DISTRICT JUDGE

	...THE COURT: Well, I am going to stop you right there. So, I think everybody agrees that under Supreme Court precedent that considering the application, I am going to apply the traditional four-factor test. You agree with me on that, don't you?

	MS. WESTWATER: I am sorry, in which four-factor --

	THE COURT: The four-factor test that you apply for the traditional four-factor test for a temporary restraining order. So, I'll just go through them for you; likelihood of success on the merits, and really one of the most significant factors which is irreparable injury to the petitioner, the likelihood of injury to the opposing party, which is you, and where the public interest lies. And when the government is the opposing party, those two final factors, the likelihood of injury to the opposing party and the public interest merge. So, I'm just -- let's just go right to that irreparable injury to the petitioner. What is your argument that there won't be irreparable injury to either the petitioner or the members of the putative class?


For the travel ban, courts would have to decide whether or not to issue a TRO by weighing the public interest and injury suffered by travelers against the claims of injury suffered by the government as well as the likeliness plaintiffs would win the case. If too many travelers suffered too great injury as a result of the ban, the courts could stop the ban for days or even weeks--ostensibly giving terrorists a window to enter the country and, by Trump's logic, seriously jeopardizing national security.

And claims of national security would not be enough for federal lawyers to succeed in court. Although Trump had argued publicly that national security supersedes consitutional concerns, courts "routinely" review and invalidate executive actions intended to promote national security, even in times of war: 


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	Indeed, federal courts routinely review the constitutionality of—and even invalidate—actions taken by the executive to promote national security, and have done so even in times of conflict. See, e.g., Boumediene, 553 U.S. 723 (striking down a federal statute purporting to deprive federal courts of jurisdiction over habeas petitions filed by non-citizens being held as “enemy combatants” after being captured in Afghanistan or elsewhere and accused of authorizing, planning, committing, or aiding the terrorist attacks perpetrated on September 11, 2001); Aptheker v. Sec’y of State, 378 U.S. 500 (1964) (holding unconstitutional a statute denying passports to American members of the Communist Party despite national security concerns); Ex parte Endo, 323 U.S. 283 (1944) (holding unconstitutional the detention of a law-abiding and loyal American of Japanese ancestry during World War II and affirming federal court jurisdiction over habeas petitions by such individuals). 

	... “courts are not powerless to review the political branches’ actions” with respect to matters of national security. Alperin v. Vatican Bank, 410 F.3d 532, 559 n.17 (9th Cir. 2005). To the contrary, while counseling deference to the national security determinations of the political branches, the Supreme Court has made clear that the Government’s “authority and expertise in [such] matters do not automatically trump the Court’s own obligation to secure the protection that the Constitution grants to individuals,” even in times of war. Humanitarian Law Project, 561 U.S. at 34 (quoting id.at 61 (Breyer, J., dissenting)); see also United States v. Robel, 389 U.S. 258, 264 (1967) (“‘[N]ational defense’ cannot be deemed an end in itself, justifying any exercise of legislative power designed to promote such a goal. . . . It would indeed be ironic if, in the name of national defense, we would sanction the subversion of one of those liberties . . . which makes the defense of the Nation worthwhile.”)


The survival of the ban would therefore be directly tied to how much harm it would render to those it affected--if the extent of the damage was that a few tourists from the seven named countries only had a weeks notice to cancel their vacations, for example, the ban might have a chance: the injuries are reparable and only an inconvenience, and plaintiffs would have a tougher time arguing their due process rights were violated. If, on the other hand, the order lead to lawful U.S. residents being detained and stranded in dangerous countries without notice or an opportunity to appeal, the travel ban would be quickly invalidated and for all intents and purposes legally doomed.

By the time the ban was signed, Trump already had a tough legal fight ahead of him. It would be up to the administration to mitigate the impact of Trump's public statements about a "Muslim ban," ensure no travelers would suffer enough inconvenience or injury (in the legal sense) to challenge the legality of the ban, and toward that end ensure that the ban would not be applied to lawful residents. Succeeding in all of this would be, by Trump's logic, a critical matter of national security: should the ban fail to hold up in court--even temporarily--foreign terrorists would have advance warning of a closing window to enter the country.


...


did he actually believe the ban would pass?

not the point

Knew there were legal problems with his proposal, tried to address them in public statements, and so can infer (I think?) he knew there would be a legal fight.

OR: Either knew there would be legal fight about ban or is a complete idiot


alibi for him: he knew there would be a legal fight but thought he had it in the bag and would win?

did he know about due process concerns? was in media

says doesn't apply to people living in the country, yet he applies it to them

so can't say for sure if he was thinking about a legal fight specifically on due process, but he did think about the problem and had a solution--if you live here, you can come back. But for some reason doesn't do that




...





https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
    ...Jan. 27, 2017

	Trump before signing the first travel ban during a ceremony at the Pentagon:

    	"This is the ‘Protection of the Nation from Foreign Terrorist Entry into the United States.’ We all know what that means."



at some point, it morphs into something involving territories

he knows this is unconsitutional, will face legal problems, has ran by his "experts" according to Guliani

and he believes partisan judges stacked against him

by Trump logic: this is big legal challenge up ahead for Trump. Can he get his ban, which people have said is unconstitutional, passed through potentially hostile courts?


...

[TODO: be more specific of what exactly ban did]

On January 27th, 2017, Trump signed Executive Order 13769, putting the travel ban into effect the moment it was signed. The immediate result has been described as "global chaos."

Because the ban was effective immediately, every person affected by the Executive Order who were currently in transit or about to travel to the United States were immediately considered barred from entry. The order canceled the visas of 60,000 - 100,000 foreign nationals who had until that moment allowed to travel to the United States. Of these, 1,200 visa-holders were denied boarding flights between January 27 and February 2. At least 109 travelers had already boarded and were subsequently detained at U.S. ports of entry, and a portion of these were sent back to their country they flew in from or attempted to be sent back. These last two groups in particular were caught by surprise by the ban: as one attorney put it in a January 28th hearing, "They took off before the executive order was signed. They landed after."


https://law.yale.edu/system/files/area/clinic/document/2017.01.28_emergency_motion_for_stay.pdf
	MR. GELERNT: -- they can't give assurances and we also just were told that the government is threatening to put someone back on a plane at 9:20 and we don't even know what's going on around the country. There are so many people -- and so we are here, what we think is a fairly modest request to the Court, to just keep things in place until both sides can brief it.

	...We think we have the better of it but certainly on irreparable harm ...They took off before the executive order was signed. They landed after. And so, they were in a horrible position. They were on U.S. soil and they certainly can't be sent back without, at a minimum, an asylum hearing and a Convention Against Torture -- I mean that is basic law.

	THE COURT: Do you have a sense of how many people we're talking about? that was another question that I had.

	MR. GELERNT: Yeah. You know, your Honor, we believe that it's upwards of a hundred to 200.


Travelers were not the only ones caught by surprise by the ban. According to the DHS Inspector General, leadership of Customs and Border Protection (CBP), primarily responsible for implementing the ban, had "virtually no warning" of the order's scope or that it was coming at all. According to then-Secretary of Homeland Security John Kelly, the Trump administration had kept the executive order on a "close hold basis" and so it was not distributed widely:


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LxKJ0FEoFqY&t=23m50s
	DHS Kelly: I did know it was under development. I had an opportunity to look at at least two--as I recollect--drafts as it got closer to Friday. Again I don't exactly know other than some of my legal shop representatives were involved, I would imagine some, on the landing team, I would imagine some of them. But the point is it came to the department it was you know on a close hold basis meaning we didn't distribute it to everyone in the department...


https://www.oig.dhs.gov/file/4678/download?token=kEDXANI_
	We found:

	* The leadership of CBP, the OHS entity primarily responsible for implementation of the order, had virtually no warning that the EO was to be issued or of the scope of the order, and was caught by surprise. Indeed, during the early period of implementation of the order, neither CBP nor the Department was sure of the answers to basic questions as to the scope of the order ...CBP was unable to issue definitive guidance in the early days of implementation of the EO, which contributed to significant delays at the ports of entry.


The DHS OIG's investigation into the travel ban found that CBP could not get answers on "basic questions" about the order from the Trump administration and so could not be sure how the order was to be implemented the first few days the ban was in effect.

The importance of this point should not be underestimated. There are questions about the ban's implementation who's answer would be crucial to it's survival in the courts: Should travelers in-transit at the time of the order be detained and sent back? What should be done to respect their due-process rights? Does the order apply to lawful permanent residents? And should U.S. residents be barred from returning home?

The answers to these questions, at least as interpreted on-the-fly by various employees of CBP, can be inferred from court documents and media reports:


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	This is the "extreme vetting" Trump promised during the campaign, but it still seems to have caught folks by surprise.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/01/28/trump-moves-past-day-refugee-ban-putin-more-executive-orders/97181992/
	...Judge grants emergency stay for those in limbo after immigration ban

	...Protests ramp up at airports across USA

	...Lawsuits also on the rise

	...Dozens detained at U.S. airports, other stranded abroad

	...Iran retaliates, Canada opens arms after Trump immigration ban

	...Trump: Immigration ban working 'nicely’

	...Refugee fallout around the USA

	...Advocacy group flooded with 1,000 calls amid 'complete chaos'

	...Iranian filmmaker Asghar Farhadi can't go to Oscars

	...Travel uncertainty for tens of thousands

	...Shockwaves felt through tech industry


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	...Homeland Security officials weren't given much guidance about how the order would be implemented or enforced. Thus the confusion and chaos.

	The ban snared green card holders and people with valid visas alike. Some travelers who were in the air when Trump signed the order weren't able to enter the country when they landed. Some were detained. Others were sent back to where they flew in from. Lawsuits began to fly and by Saturday night a federal judge had temporarily and partially blocked Trump's order.

	How big is the backlash?

	It's global. Hundreds showed up at airports across the country -- from New York to Atlanta to Dallas to Seattle -- to protest. Vocal crowds against the order gathered outside the White House. 

	...There's panic in some US colleges and universities that have a large number of foreign students. Some students and faculty members fear they'll have to decide between careers or families. Some raced back to the United States as the executive order loomed, so they would be able to complete a degree. Now they're left to wonder when they'll get to see their families again if they remain in the United States.

	...There's hardship for those who planned to come to the States as well. Mahmoud Hassan, an 18-year-old Syrian in Damascus, accepted an offer to attend MIT earlier this year, but because of the ban, he said his "dreams are basically ruined."


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-MA-0007-0004.pdf
	HAMEED KHALID DARWEESH, et al., Plaintiffs, - versus - DONALD TRUMP, et al., Defendants

	...MS. CHURCH: ...Your Honor, we do know of at least one junior at MIT who's been in contact with us who attempted to board a plane, I believe in London -- I've talked to a lot of people today, so I'm not totally positive about the location -- who was denied.

	...A representative of the Attorney General's Office has told us that there are families currently in Egypt who all are lawful permanent residents who are all -- local Boston residents who were all sent back and not allowed to board a plane.

	...And those are my two examples. I'm tracking through national immigration lawyers thousands of examples. I mean, it's happening all over the world


https://www.nbcphiladelphia.com/news/local/Assali-Family-Syria-Donald-Trump-Vote-Allentown-Immigration-Ban-Travel-Order-412238593.html
	Assali's two brothers, their wives and their two children initiated their immigration attempts in 2003 while living in Syria. In December 2016, they were approved to join Assali and her husband in Allentown after the couple bought and furnished a home for them.


https://whyy.org/articles/update-assali-family-reunited-with-syrian-relatives-at-jfk-after-trumps-order-deported-them/
	Before getting on a plane to the U.S., the two Damascus craftsmen and their wives sold their cars and other possessions in Syria to afford the plane tickets. In Allentown, a new home fixed up by their Pennsylvania relatives awaited them.


https://www.nbcphiladelphia.com/news/local/Assali-Family-Syria-Donald-Trump-Vote-Allentown-Immigration-Ban-Travel-Order-412238593.html
	But early Saturday morning, after they landed at Philadelphia International Airport, Assali's relatives were detained. They were then sent on an 18-hour flight back overseas.

	...Assali's relatives, who are all Orthodox Christians, had visas and proof of green cards. The six Syrians were told they had to go back on the next flight and return to the Middle East, according to Assali. The next day, White House Chief of Staff Reince Priebus announced that the order would not extend to green card holders.

	They went on an 18-hour flight back to Doha and are currently in Damascus, according to the Assali family. One of Assali's relatives has heart problems and was given oxygen.

	Tawfik Assali, the 21-year-old son of one of the deported Syrians, told NBC News he came to the United States three years ago and was waiting for his mother to join him.

	"I was one hour away from hugging her," he said. "Seeing her."


https://www.usnews.com/news/us/articles/2017-02-02/man-sent-back-to-iran-under-trump-travel-ban-returns-to-us
	Man sent back to Iran under Trump travel ban returns to US 

	...Vayeghan traveled to the U.S. to join his family in Los Angeles and see his son in Indiana for the first time in 12 years.

	But what was expected to be a happy reunion turned into a wrenching ordeal.

	Vayeghan's brother, sister-in-law and niece had gathered at the airport with flowers and signs, 15 minutes before the flight was scheduled to arrive. They watched family after family greet loved ones as hours passed and Vayeghan did not emerge.

	When they inquired with airport workers they were told a new immigration order had been issued and it could take several hours to process. At midnight, there was still no sign of him and an airport information desk was closed.

	"At that point we got really, really frightened," his niece, Marjan Vayghan, told The Associated Press. "Because as far as we were concerned, he had just vanished into thin air."


http://www.orlandosentinel.com/news/orange/os-iranian-flight-lands-mco-20170412-story.html
	Iranian deported under Trump travel ban lands again in Orlando

	On Jan. 28, the same day President Donald Trump signed an executive order banning immigration from seven majority-Muslim nations, Askar Sahebjam was on a plane bound for Orlando.

	When his plane touched down at OIA in January, Askar and his wife were taken into a room where they faced hours of questioning by customs, and the couple’s cellphones and social media accounts were reviewed, his attorneys said.

	As that happened, his daughter waited in the terminal for her parents, who never were released. She said she only spoke once to her father via speaker phone.


https://www.npr.org/2017/05/22/528944683/seattle-mom-sues-trump-to-stop-travel-ban-and-bring-her-son-home
	When President Trump signed an executive order banning travelers from six majority-Muslim countries, a 24-year-old mom from suburban Seattle joined several states and immigrants' rights groups in suing to stop it.

	Juweiya Ali is fighting to bring her 7-year-old son to the U.S. from Somalia. Ali was born in Somalia but she grew up here, and became a U.S. citizen. In high school, she traveled to Somalia with her mother to reconnect with their culture. That's where she met her future husband, and they had a son.

	When we sat down at a community center in the Seattle suburbs, Juweiya Ali wore a headscarf and a long, modest dress. She pulled photos of her son out of her purse. He now lives with his grandmother, halfway around the world, in Somalia.

	"Isn't he just the cutest thing?," Ali cooed. "He looks a lot like his dad. He is just so sweet."

	Ali eventually returned to the U.S., hoping to bring her family with her. But that's been a long process. She submitted the last piece of paperwork on January 20 — the same day as President Trump's inauguration.

	"So it went from feeling like everything was getting close to being done to, it stopped," Ali said. "Like, what do you mean, it stopped? It was heartbreaking."

	...Ali's son is still waiting for an interview at a U.S. consulate, the last step before he gets a visa. Even though the ban is on hold, the Trump administration is issuing fewer visas. Ali says it's hard to explain all this to her son when they video chat.

	"I can hear that in his voice, and I can see that in his eyes, the confusion," Ali said. "But I just tell him, hey, it's gonna be alright. It's going to be fine. And that's all that I can really tell a 7-year-old."


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0002.pdf
	Petitioners are 50 to 60 Lawful Permanent Residents (“LPRs”) currently detained at Dulles Airport. Respondents have detained these individuals or otherwise barred them from exiting the airport or continuing their transit into the United States. Respondents have denied these individuals access to lawyers. Upon information and belief, respondents imminently intend to remove these individuals from the United States.


https://www.nbcbayarea.com/news/local/Yemeni-Family-Stranded-by-Travel-Ban-Makes-New-Home-in-El-Sobrante-413784673.html
	Through an interpreter, Almurisi explained that back home in Yemen, he had a master's degree and practiced oral surgery. But as that country's civil war intensified, he decided it was time to get his family out.

	"I needed to protect me and my family," he said.

	He sold everything he owned, spent months getting a green card, then got on a flight to the U.S. with his wife and five children.

	When they got about four hours away from Washington, D.C., Trump's executive order was signed and went into effect. When their plane landed, the Almurisi family was ordered back on a plane and out of the country.

	"I was begging them to leave us here because of the war in Yemen," he said.


https://law.yale.edu/system/files/area/clinic/document/2017.01.28_emergency_motion_for_stay.pdf
	MR. GELERNT: ...And just with respect to the different classes, I think your Honor has basically put her finger on it, that that may end up being different arguments on the merits but as to the question that you're getting at, a factual question, are they going to face irreparable harm, absolutely. I mean, they are facing real harm because they are going back to some of the most dangerous countries.


https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-immigration-iraq-minorities/trump-travel-ban-leaves-iraqs-persecuted-yazidis-in-limbo-idUSKBN15E1E9
	ERBIL, Iraq (Reuters) - Khudeeda Naif won refuge in the United States as a member of Iraq’s Yazidi minority, but what he fears more than religious persecution is retribution for his brother’s work as an interpreter for the U.S. army in Iraq.

	Naif is one of the many affected by the U.S. President Donald Trump’s decision on Friday to temporarily ban the entry of refugees and others from seven Muslim-majority countries.

	Naif was scheduled to leave Iraq this week with his wife and two children when the International Organization for Migration (IOM) told him the trip was off until further notice.

	The insurgents systematically killed, captured and enslaved thousands of Yazidis, whose beliefs combine elements of several ancient Middle Eastern religions and are regarded by Islamic State as devil-worshippers.

	...Naif said his brother was killed in a suicide bombing along with two Americans in 2008 when U.S. forces occupied the country from 2003 to 2011.

	Although Iraqis working for the Americans use a pseudonym, his brother’s identity -- and by extension that of his family -- was revealed when he was killed.

	“Eventually, we are going to get killed,” Naif said.

	Naif’s family obtained a refugee visa to join his four sisters, brother and mother in the United States after six months of interviews and medical tests.

	...“We hope that he (Trump) changes his mind and at least takes the people who worked with them (the Americans),” Naif said.

	“We protected them,” he said. “We never expected this.”  


[said religious minorities prioritized, why not this guy? right its because refugee susneded entirely for 120 days. shows serious injury to those affected by Travel ban]


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/local/breaking/ct-trump-travel-ban-chicago-lawsuit-met-20170131-story.html
	...Dr. Amer Al Homssi, 24, a resident of internal medicine at Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, has been stuck overseas since being stopped Sunday at the Dubai airport trying to board a flight back to Chicago, according to his lawsuit.

	...The plaintiff, who filed under the pseudonym John Doe, is an Iranian citizen and legal permanent resident of the U.S. who lives in Chicago with his wife and three children. According to the suit, the man was planning to return to Chicago early this month in time for the birth of his first grandchild, but when he tried to get a return flight Saturday, the ticketing agency "refused to issue a ticket for his travel to the United States due to the executive order."


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/local/breaking/ct-green-card-iranian-artist-met-20170130-story.html
	Haghighi, 37, is now stuck in Melbourne, Australia, after vacationing there during an inopportune time — the days after President Donald Trump signed an executive order banning refugees from entering the U.S. and freezing immigration from seven Muslim-majority countries, including Iran. Haghighi got her green card last year and is traveling with an Iranian passport.

	...It's unclear how many people residing in the U.S. are stranded abroad


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-MA-0007-0004.pdf
	ARGHAVAN LOUHGHALAM AND MAZDAK POURABDOLLAH TOOTKABONI, Petitioners
	v.
	DONALD J. TRUMP, PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES, et al, Respondents

	...JUDGE BURROUGHS: ...Where are we here?

	MS. CHURCH: ...this case was filed by the emergency phone call to this court at 7:30 p.m. this afternoon while both of these individuals were still in custody

	...And on the grounds that the national restraining order in Virginia ... do not completely solve the dilemma of ... two particular clients that we intend to amend the complaint to add. And these are a lawful permanent resident who is Attorney Doyle's client who's scheduled to fly in tomorrow morning from Iran


http://www.latimes.com/politics/washington/la-na-trailguide-updates-unknown-number-of-u-s-permanent-1485627539-htmlstory.html
	Jan. 28, 2017, 10:18 a.m.
	
	Unknown number of U.S. permanent residents stuck overseas as a result of Trump's immigration ban 

	An undetermined number of longtime U.S. residents have been stranded overseas as a result of President Trump's executive order temporarily blocking visas from seven countries in the Middle East and North Africa.

	All visa holders from those seven countries are now barred entry to the U.S., including lawful permanent residents, also known as green card holders, people with U.S. work visas and other types of visas, according to a senior U.S. immigration official. The official spoke on condition of anonymity to discuss internal deliberations.

	Some of the affected countries, such as Yemen and Libya, have relatively few nationals who are U.S. permanent residents or visa holders. But a large number of Iranians have permanent residency in the U.S., as do smaller numbers from some of the other countries on the list, which includes Iraq, Syria, Somalia and Sudan.

	Trump's executive order, issued Friday, immediately affected longtime foreign residents of the U.S. who were overseas at the time the order was signed, as well as any high-skilled tech workers or other work-visa holders from those seven countries caught outside the U.S. as of Friday.

	Lawyers at the Department of Homeland Security are examining Trump's executive order and drafting instructions for border officials, the official said.

	Eventually, the administration may set up a way for some visa holders to apply for a waiver from the ban, but that is still being deliberated and will take time to set up, the official said.

	Lawyers at DHS are scrambling to understand the order and parse out what it means for procedures at airport checkpoints and ports of entry around the country.

	Most senior DHS officials were not aware of the coming changes before they were released Friday. Immigration and customs officers are struggling to figure out which incoming travelers to let in while at the same time keep up with the normal flow of travel, the senior US immigration official said. 



https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	State of Washington; State of Minnesota, Plaintiffs-Appellees,
	v,
	Donald J. Trump, President of the United States

	...The impact of the Executive Order was immediate and widespread. It was reported that thousands of visas were immediately canceled, hundreds of travelers with such visas were prevented from boarding airplanes bound for the United States or denied entry on arrival, and some travelers were detained. 

	...the States have offered ample evidence that if the Executive Order were reinstated even temporarily, it would substantially injure the States and multiple “other parties interested in the proceeding.” Nken, 556 U.S. at 434 (quoting Hilton v. Braunskill, 481 U.S. 770, 776 (1987)). When the Executive Order was in effect, the States contend that the travel prohibitions harmed the States’ university employees and students, separated families, and stranded the States’ residents abroad. These are substantial injuries and even irreparable harms. See Melendres v. Arpaio, 695 F.3d 990, 1002 (9th Cir. 2012) (“It is well established that the deprivation of constitutional rights ‘unquestionably constitutes irreparable injury.’” (quoting Elrod v. Burns, 427 U.S. 347, 373 (1976))).


Within hours of its signing, any hopes that travelers would lack standing to challenge the already legally precarious travel ban were dashed. The ban cut short years of efforts of a U.S. citizen to bring home her six year old son and stranded a Chicago businessman visiting his ailing mother in Iran. A family had sold their cars and possessions to get green cards and plane tickets to the U.S. to escape civil war in Syria, only to be sent back upon arrival. The brother of a fallen U.S. army interpreter feared for his family's life but was left stranded in Iraq.


Among others, a junior at MIT, a Harvard medical student, a U.S. doctor who flew to the United Arab Emirates for his wedding, a Chicago resident visiting his ailing mother in Iran, and the brother of a fallen U.S. army employee attempting to escape persecution in Iraq and join his family in the U.S. were all left stranded in potentially dangerous countries by the travel ban. 

Those who were in the air when the ban was signed suffered hardship, too: over fifty lawful permanent residents were detained after arriving at Dulles Airport and were allegedly denied access to lawyers, and the government initially tried to send them back--after the court stayed their removal, one CBP officer even chased down a taxing aircraft to stop a lawful resident on board from being deported. Others' weren't so lucky: a family of lawful Boston residents and man visiting his son for the first time in 12 years were sent back, among others.



Within hours of its signing, the ban had already split families and stranded U.S. residents. Because the Trump administration ensured the ban applied to travelers in flight at the time it was signed and CBP had interpreted the ban, at least for some travelers, as applying to lawful permanent residents returning from trips overseas, hundreds of visa holders were detained at U.S. airports, a portion of these were sent back, and an "unknown number" of returning U.S. residents were left stranded.

This created immediate problems for the Trump administration: any traveler so affected would have standing to petition for a temporary restraining order on the ban, which was already on shaky constiutional grounds due to Trump's prior public statements that it was a Muslim ban. For a temporary restraining order, petitioners would have to show that the ban was harming plaintiffs and would likely be struck down once courts had time to review it. Since Trump himself had already made a compelling argument that the ban was motivated by religious animus with his public statements, and due process was not given to those detained and stranded by the ban, petitioners had strong base from which to argue the ban would likely be struck down as unconstitutional. The chaos of the ban's rollout, the large number of those injured in a legal sense, and the severity of those injuries would only bolster plaintiff's arguments that the balance of harm weighed in favor of travelers and that this harm would only continue if the ban were not stayed. 

The first petition for a restraining order came amidst the initial chaos of the ban. On Jan 28, 2017, plaintiffs filed an emergency motion to stay deportations solely due to the ban; since the ban was effective immediately, travelers from the seven listed countries who were in flight at the time had to be sent back to comply with the executive order. This included lead plaintiff Hameed Darweesh, an Iraqi citizen who had been targeted for his work as an interpreter for the U.S. army. 


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-NY-0053-0001.pdf

According to court documents, Darweesh had fled persection within his own country twice: once after police affiliated with anti-American militias searched his home, and another after he learned men he believed to be terrorists where searching for his home. Darweesh had a reason to fear for his life: two of his colleagues were killed shortly after his home was searched. Darweesh applied for an Iraqi Special Immigrant Visa (SIV), a program created by Congress to give refuge to Iraqis who faced threats due to their work for the United States. At the time the ban was signed, Darweesh had been traveling to the United States on this visa, where upon entry he was to recieve a green card in the mail.







an Iraqi who had worked for the U.S. military and believed his life would be in danger were he flown back to Iraq. Petitioners' counsel argued Darweesh and others in the same situation would face irreperable harm if the ban were allowed to continue to apply to them, as they would be deported back to some of the most dangerous countries. Those who had not yet been deported were detained at the time the emergency motion was filed.

At the same time, plaintiffs filed a petition to release the detainees. This petition argued plaintiffs had been detained unlawfully on both statutory and constitutional grounds: detainees were denied their right to apply for asylum, in violation of due process 

"Convention Against Torture" act says can't return someone to country where they would face persecuction or torture. (or USC 1231(b))

"deprived of their rights under 8 U.S.C 1231(b) ... without due process of law"



The petition for the emergency stay on removal was filed at the same time as a petition for the detainees at JFK airport to be released. By Trump's logic, these detainees 


did they also petition to release them? basically DOJ saying well maybe people on tourist visas will be let in, and could have different motivations. So I guess Trump admin would argue this damages national security by letting in people on tourist visas who haven't been "extreme vetted"

if I read right, petitioners asked for no more detentions, but order was to just prevent deporation. So the case threatened national security by Trump logic but order ultimately didn't.

significaanse of case: DOJ still looked awful in hearing, courts early on showing ban likely not to win, if it could proceed would strike down in court--and as long as these people still detained, gov can't argue the case is moot.

stay not initially clarified that it was nationwide, important since plaintiffs argued noncompliance with court order. Later ammended with LPR asking court that she won't be detained and deported on 29th. Another thing Yates would have to argue against.

for darweesh petitioned for habeaus corups and emergency motion to stay removal. habeaus corpus petition not "emergency" I guess, but argues against ban on constitutional grounds and so still existential threat to ban. According to Aziz v. Trump, its harder for aliens to sue outside u.s. soil than on u.s. soil. So not removing them (I guess) gives them better chance to win (unless LPR).

By Trump logic, a national security problem to let any of these people in, since they have not been "extreme" vetted and trump did not yet have time to "figure out what's going on."


...


https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/due_process
	The Constitution states only one command twice. The Fifth Amendment says to the federal government that no one shall be "deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law." The Fourteenth Amendment, ratified in 1868, uses the same eleven words, called the Due Process Clause, to describe a legal obligation of all states. These words have as their central promise an assurance that all levels of American government must operate within the law ("legality") and provide fair procedures. Most of this essay concerns that promise.

	...The clause also promises that before depriving a citizen of life, liberty or property, government must follow fair procedures. Thus, it is not always enough for the government just to act in accordance with whatever law there may happen to be. Citizens may also be entitled to have the government observe or offer fair procedures, whether or not those procedures have been provided for in the law on the basis of which it is acting. Action denying the process that is “due” would be unconstitutional. Suppose, for example, state law gives students a right to a public education, but doesn't say anything about discipline. Before the state could take that right away from a student, by expelling her for misbehavior, it would have to provide fair procedures, i.e. “due process.”



https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/due_process
	An unbiased tribunal.
    Notice of the proposed action and the grounds asserted for it.
    Opportunity to present reasons why the proposed action should not be taken.
    The right to present evidence, including the right to call witnesses.
    The right to know opposing evidence.
    The right to cross-examine adverse witnesses.
    A decision based exclusively on the evidence presented.
    Opportunity to be represented by counsel.
    Requirement that the tribunal prepare a record of the evidence presented.
    Requirement that the tribunal prepare written findings of fact and reasons for its decision.


...


Darweesh v. Trump possible because EO affected people stuck in mid air, and admin now basically forced themselves to deport these people.


The first three notable suits were filed amidst the initial chaos of the travel ban. On Jan 28, 2017, plaintiffs filed an emergency motion to stop people who had already landed in the U.S. from being deported back to the country they flew in from due to the ban. These include lead plaintiff Hameed Darweesh, an Iraqi who had worked for the U.S. military and believed his life would be in danger were he flown back to Iraq. Petitioners' counsel argued Darweesh and others in the same situation would face irreperable harm if the ban were allowed to continue to apply to them, as they would be deported back to some of the most dangerous countries.

Since this was for a temporary stay, petitioners only had to show likliness they would win and injury to them greater than injury to opponent. Chaos of EO gave them a lot of ways to claim injury

would be up to DOJ to argue they would not suffer irreparable injury


...


Aziz for LPRs detained

lead plantiffs initial LPRs, claimed they were forced to sign away LPR status

summary of Aziz case: https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/30/trump-travel-ban-yemenis-coerced-relinquish-green-card


ammended doc says Aziz bros lied to, tricked into signing away LPR and forced to be detained, ended up stranded in ethiopia

if remember right Aziz put TRO on ban for dulles, but really just made explicit can't detain or send back LPRs at dulles


DHS says this:

	We found that the lack of a public or congressional relations strategy significantly hampered CBP. For example, in Aziz v. Trump, a federal court had temporarily enjoined CBP at Dulles airport in Virginia from returning LPRs. The court had also ordered CBP to "permit lawyers access to all [LPRs] being detained at Dulles .... " CBP complied with the order not to remove LPRs and soon after the TRO issued, processed for entry the remaining five LPRs held in secondary inspection. However, CBP did not communicate that LPRs were not being denied access to lawyers either to the public or in response to Congressional inquiries, resulting in significant public protests and suspicion that CBP was not complying with a court order.


says could not remove LPRs, had to give them lawyers


Nixon Peabody LLC:

	The Aziz petitioners detail their experiences in their complaint. Although they were LPRs and had "valid entry documents," CPB prevented them from leaving IAD. Petition for Writ of Habeas Corpus and Complaint for Declaratory and Injunctive Relief, E.D. Va., Case No. 17-cv- 116, Dkt. 1 (Jan. 28, 2017), ¶2. CPB detained the petitioners when they arrived at IAD on the morning of Saturday, January 28, 2017. Id. at 'Irlf 25-26. They were held that entire day, without access to counsel. Id


detained for a day without lawyers


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0002.pdf

petition for TRO was on behalf of "50 to 60 Lawful Permanent Residents" detained at Dulles.

says believ they will be detained, will suffer irreparable harm if not issued TRO (doesn't Darweesh apply? maybe timing close), would lose legal rights if detained (difference for people in vs. outside U.S.)

Argues they can't understand legal rights if denied access to lawyers, have right to enter as LPRs.

so first was petition for habeaus corpus, then petitioned for lawyers to be able to visit and for them not to be removed for 7 days.

"likeliness to win" outlined in Habeaus corpus petition

https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0003.pdf

lead petitioners Tarq and Ammar Aziz two brothers 19 and 21, initial LPRs, landed at IAD to see father, detained for a day without a lawyer.

lawyers ask: is there sufficient justification for them to be detained?

but basically crux of argument is: these people need lawyers, and might be legally screwed if deported, so let lawyers see them and don't deport in meantime.

Argues fifth amendent due process, establishment clause rights violated, against 1101(a)(13(c)), Rosenberg v. Fleuti

so should get right: asked for multiple things

first asked for them to be released

what happened to that?

then same day ask well at least don't deport and let them see lawyers


later on 30th new petition of habeas corpus, saying they are being bullied and tricked into giving up LPR status

Feb 3rd judge extends original TRO, orders virginia to list LPRs and visa holders detained or removed due to EO


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0032.pdf

dude had rought life after civil war in Yemen, wanted to come to America


https://www.clearinghouse.net/detail.php?id=15595
	The plaintiffs filed an amended complaint on January 30, 2017, clarifying the class. The plaintiffs defined the class as: "individuals with legal permanent resident status or who are traveling on valid U.S. immigrant visas who have been or will be either detained and/or coerced into signing a Form I-407." The complaint asserted that CBP had refused to follow the court's TRO by claiming that the affected individuals were not in "detention," but were rather undergoing "processing." The Aziz brothers in particular had been deported and were stranded in the airport in Addis Ababa, without their passports or green cards, both of which had been confiscated. 


Aziz v Trump was one were CBP had trouble following, according to OIG report. Flagged down taxing plane to comply with order, CBP noticed from TV. Court docs say even after initial TRO Aziz bros were still deported. OIG report also says Aziz violated by "no board" issued to airplanes--did they keep Aziz bros stranded?

actually, OIG report does not specifically call out Aziz, specific for Boston case, Mohamad, and Darweesh ("serious concerns" for Darweesh)

Aziz important from waht I can see so far for two reasons: a lawful resident trying to enter U.S. from war torn country then deported is egregious (though a wrinkle as they were "initial LPRs"--returning LRPs also removed?) and shows how CBP dropping the ball and not making things easy for DOJ.

The ammended complaint and situation with Aziz brothers deported filed Jan 30, in time to be on Yates' desk (iirc Yates decision on 4:30 PM that day)

case eventually taken over by state of virginia

kept local to virginia due to Washington case


Aziz bros were initial LRPs. Any returning LPRs removed?

two ammended petitions filed on Jan 30

https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0016.pdf

pg 5

	Petitioners JOHN DOES 1-60 are approximately 60 lawful permanent residents of the United States, or immigrant visa holders, all nationals of Syria, Libya, Iran, Iraq, Somalia, Yemen or Sudan, who landed at Dulles Airport on January 27 and/or 28, 2017. Upon information and belief, some of theseJohn Does were, like Tareq and Ammar, unlawfully forced to withdraw their applications for admission by means of being compelled into signing I-407 forms against their will and without their knowledge or consent, and placed on planes headed to foreign countrie


says info other LPRs forced to sign away status and sent back

footnote saying will amend with specifics as more info available

https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0004.pdf

2nd doc says same thing

https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0031.pdf

So they had Aziz and an F-1 student write declarations, they got screwed over, but what about returning LPRs removed? does he ever actually identify John Does like they said they would?

later

" Joint Declaration of Madeleine K. Albright, Avril D. Haines, Michael V. Hayden, John F. Kerry, John E. McLaughlin, Lisa O. Monaco, Michael J. Morell, Janet A. Napolitano, Leon E. Panetta, and Susan E. Rice [ECF# 57] "

wtf is this


Virginia ordered to list who was detained/removed and lawyers say they will identify John Does, instead they waste time and have Madeline Albright, Mike Morell, Janet Napolitano and Susan Rice come out to say how bad the ban is and politicize everything some more


is what they say good enough? it's like they're trying to make case look less credible

DHS investigation says CBP flagging down planes to comply with Aziz

OIG found DHS complied with order "soon after" TRO issued and processed for entry "the remaining five LPRs held in secondary inspection"

if it went from "50 to 60" to five, before court order, only one way that can happen... (actually no there are two ways, can still give them waivers and let them go)


so sounds credible others were deported

clearinghouse says oral args happened--maybe something in there? says before Feb 10


so OIG says DHS did good (or better) job complying with court orders on U.S. soil than abroad. Says complied with Aziz.

plaintiffs, if I read right, say CBP violated court order in removing Aziz

pg 12 deals with violations of court order

https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0004.pdf

says Aziz were in fligth at time TRO was issued!

says LPRs in detention denied to see lawyers, citing daily beast article and cory booker

something off--says the detainees were given a list of lawyers to call, but weren't allowed to meet with a throng of lawyers that had gathered outside there airport with free legal services

maybe couldn't just let lawyers in without detainees asking?

article cited:

https://www.thedailybeast.com/trumps-border-agents-defy-judge-us-senator-at-dulles-airport-as-his-first-constitutional-crisis-unfolds
	At this point, it wasn’t clear how many people were detained and which of them were legal permanent residents of the U.S. Lawyers didn’t even know all the names of the people they were trying to help. It wasn’t clear if some detainees had been put back on planes returning to their countries of origin, or if detainees had been shuttled off to immigrant detention centers in Northern Virginia. The travelers were all being held in what’s called “secondary inspection,” referred to as “secondary.” It’s part of the CBP screening process where lawyers are rarely, if ever, allowed to be present.

	But lawyers who spoke to The Daily Beast said it’s also unheard of for government agencies like CBP to prevent people who have the legal right to live in the U.S. from seeing their lawyers. And that’s what was happening.

	After Brinkema’s order came down, and lawyers at Dulles prepared to meet their new clients, the CBP balked, barring these lawyers from seeing their would-be clients. 


hmm

sounds like the detainees hadn't hired these lawyers?

I think I get it

detainees free to get lawyers, but CBP not going to let the lawyers into restricted area to tell them about it

maybe CBP could have said there are these lawyers out there and you can call them (would have been nice thing to do)

but if I read right, this means CBP was mean for this case (pending facts) but did not violate court order (more on this here, says CBP did shit job of helping detainees get lawyer, informing them: https://www.politico.com/story/2017/02/trump-officials-travel-ban-234633)

	...Lawyers wrung their hands. And then, slowly, detainees started trickling out, one or two at a time. One woman who had been detained doubled over sobbing as she walked through the crowd. She nearly collapsed onto a loved one. Another man who was detained, Javad Fotouhi, calmly fielded questions from a scrum of reporters about the four hours he spent in secondary. When CBP finally let him go, he said, they didn’t say why. 


article says detainees released

but clearly some also sent back

so here could be an underhanded thing by CBP or Trump admin: between petition and order, could have rushed deporting some detainees.

In fact evidence so far says this happened: CBP were chasing planes to comply with Aziz, and Aziz bros themselves were in flight when TRO issued

not helping the DOJ


https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/public-safety/yemenese-brothers-deported-at-dulles-will-likely-be-allowed-back-into-us/2017/02/02/7daa044c-e94c-11e6-bf6f-301b6b443624_story.html?utm_term=.d252c66aa437
	Feb 2

	...Now, Virginia Attorney General Mark R. Herring (D) says they probably will be allowed into the country.

	“The government has moved quickly to make the case go away to avoid being subject to an order compelling it to produce information about its actions,” Herring’s spokesman Michael Kelly said in a statement. “They now appear to be working out some kind of arrangement with the Aziz brothers, the named plaintiffs in the suit, that would apparently ‘resolve Petitioners claims,’ presumably by getting them back into the country.”


kept them stranded out there until Yates fired

a familiar pattern...



and why, this whole time, weren't they granted relief from being detained? would have fixed the whole debacle right from the start. Cory Booker could've saved a trip.

why did media, lawyers focus on allegations of being denied right to a lawyer when lawful U.S. residents were being sent back to war torn countries...



how rushed were they in sending ppl back and how many? courts wanted to know:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/public-safety/va-demands-more-details-on-travel-ban-detentions-at-dulles-international-airport/2017/02/01/f10aef32-e8de-11e6-80c2-30e57e57e05d_story.html?tid=a_inl&utm_term=.e90cc2c334b7

allegations or concerns that CBP violated court order

	In the motion, Herring called on federal officials to submit sworn statements to address four key questions: The time officials received the notice of the temporary restraining order on Jan. 28; the number of air passengers that arrived at Dulles International Airport from Jan. 27, 28 and 29 with “lawful permanent residence who were removed from the United States both before and after the receipt of the actual notice” of the restraining order; whether any such arrivals were denied prompt access to counsel; and the names and titles of all government officials, if any, who instructed Customs and Border Protection personnel not to comply with the temporary restraining order.

did they ever find out?


...

darweesh


Petitioners also argued that the ban was intended to discriminate against Muslims due to the President's public statements, and so violated the equal protection and establishment clauses of the Constitution. By this, plaintiffs 



darweesh one were we have hearing for DOJ trying to argue in court

was emergency motion for stay, so for this have to argue DOJ likely to win, injuries suffered not to great

this is where court goes over "four tests," irreperable harm being key. 4 tests are: liklihood of success on merits, irreperable injury to petitioner, lielihood of injury to opposing party, and public interest. Since gov is opposiing party, liklihood of injury to them and public interest merged.

DOJ (Riley) could not assure that others who showed up could not be deported, even for the "two named plaintiffs"

says "unfolded at such speed" that "haven't had opportunity" to address legal issues

Westwater tries to say request is overbroad, court says "can you argue class won't suffer irreparable injury?"

had trouble arguing they wouldn't suffer irreperable injury

court: "I don't hear you to be arguing there's some particular risk posed by this class of people"

doj Westwater says tourists a different class, different interests

petitioner says is broad but says they've all been vetted already, and facing "real harm" because "going back to the most dangerous countries"

court asks: putting someone back on plane to syria. Irreparable harm?

Westwater: gov does not have sufficient information to have a position... require more time to have facts

court: exactly why I grant emergency stay

basically, DOJ couldn't argue they weren't suffering irreparable harm and were a danger to the U.S.


argue likely not to win on weighing damage

for likeliness not to win, point out discriminatory?

petition said violated due process rights, equal protection


why was stay granted?

almost entirely DOJ not doing well it seems

EO getting people in mid air

Trump public statements

...


Boston case




https://www.politico.com/story/2017/02/trump-officials-travel-ban-234633
	In Boston, where federal judges ordered the government to stop detaining or deporting people who would be allowed into the U.S. were it not for Trump’s executive order, CBP Watch Commander Jason Jalbert told airlines the agency would continue deporting people at Logan International Airport “where it is permissible under the law.” An Iranian scientist with an approved visa sued CBP for keeping her off a Tuesday flight from Switzerland to Boston.


more detain on violating Boston court order

	
	The CBP officers at airports were not rogue individual actors, according to the documents obtained and people interviewed by POLITICO. Rather, the agents on the ground were following orders from high in their chain of command.



goes up high in chain of command, agrees with OIG summary



...


prelude to John Doe case? stranded families?


next section:





...






led to court cases

especially boston case ended ban national security wise


Due process for returning lawful permanent residents is established by legal history and explicitly provided by immigration law.  


Because the ban was signed without warning, none of those detained, stranded, or removed from the country had 

explain how constitutional rights violated




the court cases being filed, LPRs denied constitutional rights

what DOJ is up against

why exactly are these cases unwinnable?

you can't detain someone and send them on a flight to wherever without notice and due process

...



What is known about the DHS OIG's findings partially answers some of these questions, at least how CBP interpreted it: the IG found that CBP was "was very aggressive in preventing affected travelers from boarding aircraft bound for the United States," issuing multiple "no board" orders to airlines that blocked travel for those to whom the order applied. According to a January 28th hearing, this included lawful permanent residents returning home, who were effectively stranded by the order:



...

Aziz and Boston case are LPRs detained after arriving in U.S.

alleges due process violations in petition, also talks of discrimination, establishment and equal protection violated

so making constitutional argument in case over weekend

Boston (iirc) case also has 50-60 "john doe" LPRs (might have been dulles case)

Aziz (iirc) alleges that gov sought to send back some petitioners to country they flew in from


summary of Aziz case: https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/30/trump-travel-ban-yemenis-coerced-relinquish-green-card

claiims Aziz brothers forced to sign away permanent resident status and were flown out of country


Azad v. Trump has one petitioner a 78 year old woman trying to visit her grandchildren, she was sick and had to take medicine regularly and had to go to hospital while in CBP custody


in Ali v. Trump, a U.S. citizen trying to take her 6 year old into the country was (effectively) barred from entry, her kid had visas but got revoked. Actually, doesn't seem right--I think she was already in U.S., and her kid was with grandmonther in Somalia and couldn't come over due to EO

so Ali is all about U.S. citizens and LPRs who's family members wanted to come see them, they filled out all the paperwork for visas and payed fees, paid plane tickets (one more than $2k), but all were cancelled without warning by the EO.



Asili vs. DHS and Azimi vs. Trump filed jan 31, not sure if DOJ would have anticipated

Al-Mowafak Feb 2 covers students with F-1 visas


Al-Hommsi v Trump: filed for TRO (I think?) Jan 29 but no doc, medical resident barred from returning, as such great cost to him. Don't think he was LPR (didn't say), but maybe a hard case to win regardless


...

https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0004.pdf

amended petition in Aziz case

claims Aziz brothers lied to, tricked/forced into signing away LPR status, and this applies to others trying to enter U.S.

they were sent back on plane, stranded in ethiopia

says they were not yet technically LPRs, but would be upon entering U.S. and handing in paperwork

says other plaintiffs, but don't know who they are??


...


https://d279m997dpfwgl.cloudfront.net/wp/2017/02/Gorton-order.pdf

another hearing on Boston case, on Jan 31 (maybe not? mentions the Feb 1 McGahn memo)

says petition ammended to include others

pg 8

says because of McGahn memo, LPR claims are moot

in one sense this is bad, since this removes need for discovery of which lawful residents were unlawfully removed, detained. Wash v Trump didn't buy mootness argument.

good to mention this: trump admin acted like it wanted to prevent discovery: withdrew EO as soon as oral arguments for for wash caes came out, McGahn memo maybe same effect, held up DHS OIG report

want to see: what case did LPRs bring against EO before Yates decision? any resident stranded (and could be a lot) would have strong case

presumably DOJ would have realized this at the time even if no litigation started by then

guess: detained and removed strongest case, stranded next strongest


...

For Boston case, gov tried to argue moot since plaintiffs were released, lawyer countered saying DOJ rep informed them that families of LPRs were detained in Egypt due to EO and could get affidavits for them.

did Church ever get these affidavits?

later (Feb 10)? gov comes with same argument that case is moot



...


CBP has ordered airlines to ban travel into U.S., including for LPRs

because ban signed immediately, travelers caught off guard. Get on plane before ban, get off after and get detained. Be about to come home, next day find you are blocked.

LPRs detained, stranded, visas denied, global chaos

This leads to lawsuits, court orders

Court cases pile up, three injunctions against ban, flights are being diverted to Boston to get around ban

It is up to DOJ to stop court orders and save "national security"

...

ban on "close hold basis" according to Kelly, only a few informed

ban had been leaked 25th, but since then CBP officers did not have opportunity to ask clarifying questions or plan implementation

CBP officers not told, get confusing directives as to how to implement, if it applies to LPRs. "caught by surprise" and confused about court orders, even basics of the ban. Conflicting directions, unclear guidance.







https://www.oig.dhs.gov/file/4678/download?token=kEDXANI_
	While CBP complied with court orders at U.S. ports of entry with travelers who had already arrived , CBP was very aggressive in preventing affected travelers from boarding aircraft bound for the United States, and took actions that, in our view, violated two separate court orders that enjoined them from this activity.    

	Specifically , from January 29, 2017 through February 3, 2017, CBP attempted to prevent Boston-bound passengers from the EO affected countries by issuing "no board" instructions to the airlines. This was in violation of an order issued by a Boston court, in *Louhghalam v. Trump*, which required CBP to notify airlines of the exact opposite - that , as a result of the court's order, the affected travelers would in effect be admissible, absent other grounds for inadmissibility, such as document fraud, since the EO could no longer form the basis of finding them inadmissible. All airlines, save one , obeyed the CBP no-board instructions. Lufthansa, citing the litigation, took the position that it would board EO-affected travelers on flights to the United States ,notwithstanding CBP's "no board" instructions. All of the EO-affected passengers on two Lufthansa flights were admitted to the United States upon arrival in Boston.   

	Additionally, CBP continued to issue "no board" instructions to airlines after a January 31, 2017 nationwide court order, *Mohammed v. United States*, enjoined CBP from blocking the entry of travelers affected by the EO .   

	Finally, while complying with the letter of the January 28, 2017 order in *Darweesh v. Trump*, we have serious concerns about CBP's actions in nevertheless issuing "no board" instructions to airlines, and denying entry to travelers at CBP's overseas preclearance facilities, in light of the court's finding that there was a strong likelihood that the EO "violated [travelers'] rights to Due Process and Equal Protection guaranteed by the United States Constitution."


"no board" orders led directly to LPRs being stranded according to court docs






...


doj has not been informed of ban:


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	This is the "extreme vetting" Trump promised during the campaign, but it still seems to have caught folks by surprise.

	Team Trump apparently never ran the order by officials at the Justice Department. 


http://www.cnn.com/TRANSCRIPTS/1705/19/acd.03.html
    COOPER: If the department of justice, their office of legal counsel was given a heads up so to speak about this and asked to review it, wouldn't they have given you head's up about it?

    YATES: Normally, they would. But my understanding is that they were asked not to tell us about it.

    COOPER: The department of justice's office of legal counsel was advised not to inform you specifically, the acting attorney general about this executive order.

    YATES: That's my understanding.

    COOPER: Do you know why you were not informed?

    YATES: I don't know. And I wasn't informed.

    COOPER: Is that normal procedure?

    YATES: No. First I heard of that.

    COOPER: You never heard it happening before.

    YATES: No.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	KLOBUCHAR: And during that meeting did they mention -- anyone mention that this refugee order was about to come out?

	YATES: No.

	KLOBUCHAR: Did the acting Attorney General of the United States?

	YATES: No and that was one thing that was of concern to us, is that not only was department leadership not consulted here and beyond department leadership, really the subject matter experts, the national security experts, not only was the department not consulted, we weren't even told about it. I learned about this from media reports.

...

DOJ, fed attorneys do a very bad job of defending against these orders in court

they aren't getting much help from Trump admin

some try to argue: maybe court order not necessary, maybe gov can sort it out, maybe it doesn't really apply to LPRs

CPB orders airlines to ban travel in defiance of court orders brought for stranded LPRs.

courts (boston decision) challenge ban on constitutional grounds: due process and religious discrimination

...

turns out it is a Muslim ban

this is unconstitutional

established by Trump's public statements, text of EO

"well established" courts look at surrounding evidence to determine intent of order

Trump is aware a Muslim ban is unconstitutional, even as he makes statements that add to evidence that it is a Muslim ban

ban is legally doomed

but doom comes early

...

Trump and his surrogates are still making public statements that establish it's a Muslim ban


prioritizing christians had impact, makes problems:


https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-immigration-iraq-minorities/trump-travel-ban-leaves-iraqs-persecuted-yazidis-in-limbo-idUSKBN15E1E9
	The order said “religious minorities facing persecution in their countries” would be given priority when refugee admissions resume.

	More than one hundred Yazidis are waiting for their IOM asylum applications to be processed, Saib Khidr, a prominent Yazidi lawyer and human rights activist close to the Baba Sheikh, the top religious leader of the community.

	A Yazidi woman was denied boarding a flight to the United States on Sunday, he said.

	Khidr said he had hoped Yazidis would be among those given priority but was concerned that Trump only mentioned the persecution of Syrian Christians when asked about the issue in an interview with the Christian Broadcasting Network.

	“We’re disappointed,” he told Reuters in Baghdad. “We’re waiting for the American side to clarify its position.” 

[by same logic that bad dudes might rush in, would bad dudes rush to hurt/kill persecuted minorities while refugee program completely suspended?]


So EO basically over at this point. DOJ look like idiots, probably unhappy at this point, legal battle is stacked against them.

Yates meets with lawyers that Monday. Lawyers tired, humiliated. The state of Washington had just filed a complaint saying the whole EO is unconstitutional. Someone tells Yates she has to make a judgement on the order's constitutionality by Monday...


...






------


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	It was a wild couple of days of chaos and confusion after President Trump signed his travel ban. Not up to speed on what went down over the weekend? Here's a quick primer.

	What happened?






------




https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	...Although we agree that “the Government’s interest in combating terrorism is an urgent objective of the highest order,” Holder v. Humanitarian Law Project , 561 U.S. 1, 28 (2010), the Government has done little more than reiterate that fact. Despite the district court’s and our own repeated invitations to explain the urgent need for the Executive Order to be placed immediately into effect, the Government submitted no evidence to rebut the States’ argument that the district court’s order merely returned the nation temporarily to the position it has occupied for many previous years.



https://www.facebook.com/DonaldTrump/posts/10158567643610725
	Jan 29

	We will keep it free and keep it safe, as the media knows, but refuses to say. My policy is similar to what President Obama did in 2011 when he banned visas for refugees from Iraq for six months. The seven countries named in the Executive Order are the same countries previously identified by the Obama administration as sources of terror. To be clear, this is not a Muslim ban, as the media is falsely reporting. 


Trump knows something like his EO can pass, and knows "partisan" judges will be up against him. He's no stranger to courts.

He appears to believe all Obama appointees out to get him.

So he knows he's up for a tough battle against courts.

So here's an alibi for not keeping Yates in the loop: he thinks she will collude with courts, not defend his ban, or try to sabotage the whole thing.

In this case, the obvious thing to do is to wait for AG to be installed, go ahead.

Otherwise, anyone can predict what would happen: the ban would lose in court, and Trump would have "shown his hand" to these dangerous terrorists.

The Democrats in Congress have been delaying his pick for AG

Trump might think, how am I going to get this ban out there then? will I have to wait until Congress gives me an AG?

so he decides to do the ban anyway, without informing the DOJ, most of the DHS...

but he has to expect the ban will fail, and show his hand--it's a stupid move.

So what is motivation?

Only thing he would get out of it that is clear is that it will give him a shot at firing AG and getting "his people in." This is an immediate problem for Trump one way or another.

And, in fact, making it obvious to court it's a Muslim ban and expediating litigation makes that happen.

And so this is the same argument as before, but with a different motivation: to clear an AG he thinks is undermining his travel ban, or in general.

This doesn't help Trump much, but shift in motive means can argue not provably guilty of obstruction of Justice, but maybe abuse of power (global chaos to get rid of AG).

It's hard to think of any other motive for sending out an obvious Muslim ban to a legal battle he knows he'll lose (apparently thinks both legal defense and offense against him). But could be... would have to be creative?


------


use the Arpiao case as an example of why due process should apply to illegal residents



------


here's a Trump alibi:

Trump never intended to inform Yates or other DOJ and DHS officials about the ban. He didn't trust them, and thought they'd leak it, collude with courts, give bad advice, or otherwise undermine him. Yates warning about Flynn only bolstered this suspicion. He really wanted to wait for Sessions, who's confirmation Democrat congressmen were delaying.

But the leak forced his hand. After the leak, Trump knew he had to enact the ban soon--bad dudes would be rushing into the country the whole time. At the same time, Trump was unprepared to roll out the travel ban since he was waiting for Jeff Sessions. But he decided to do it anyway--a "hail mary" pass. It was either that or suffer the delays of Democrats in Congress while hoards of Muslim terrorists pour into the country.

The confusion and LPRs getting detained--which led immediately to court cases that shut down the ban--were not his intention. In fact, they might have been plots from Obama appointees and the Muslim brotherhood trying to undermine him. And, by all accounts, this plot to undermine Trump's travel ban succeeded: travelers were wrongly detained, and the courts shut down the ban almost immediately.

Trump saw the awful performance of the DOJ defending the ban in courts and knew that everything he predicted was right: the political Obama DOJ was trying to sabotage his ban. It was then that he knew what he had to do: fire acting Attorney General Sally Yates. Then, if he were able to install someone loyal who truly understands the Muslim threat, he might have time to salvage the ban and close the spigot of the terrorist hoards.

But it was not enough: the slow and political courts were still able to prevail; the Muslim Brotherhood/ACLU's joint efforts to destroy his ban had already taken their toll.


...


for this to work, have to answer some questions:

why all these things, by Trump himself, that seem to undermine his own ban? Putting the bit on religious persecution in there, his public statement on that, public statements implying it's a muslim ban. Applying to LPRs in the first place. Would these be part of some grand plot to undermine him too? (well kindof? possibly? but by what would he argue that? possible it was a plot to make the ban fail in court, but for a different reason...)

Why did it take so long to "clarify" that the EO didn't apply to LPRs? Took McGahn 3 days, and courts were not convinced this was strong enough as an official executive position. We are assuming this is crisis mode for the President, why not see what's going on and act fast to clarify confusion about the EO? even a public statement by the president. Instead, while all this is going on, Trump is saying the ban is "going great." Trump would have to argue he was grossly misinformed on what was actually happening with the ban (how much was he informed?).

And why did it take so long to put out a fixed EO? It was a month later. He waited until oral arguments against 1st ban came out to drop it. This itself might undermine Trump's position that things were urgent and he had to act quickly--why would it take so long to write a fixed EO? (should look into. Also important is for what period of time was original ban actually in effect?)

Also should look at differences between 1st and 2nd EO, maybe understand what was up with Iraq ban, something which apparently undermined his ban as well (soldiers denied entry to U.S.).

And even second travel ban didn't pass courts for similar reasons. Was it really not until recently that he figured out he could just have a proclimation to include NK and Chad and fix everything? if travel from those countries should be banned, why wasn't that in the original EO?

Second travel ban also had 10 days notice. Apparently he gave up on the "bad dudes rushing in" theory. Would have to argue he decided it was too late by then I guess. Still begs question of why not try some kind of fix to EO sooner.

And, assuming his hand was forced and made a "hail mary pass," why not prepare better for that? If he actually wanted the ban to win in court, there are a lot of things he could have done differently (get DOJ he had informed and prepared at minimum, even ask Yates to step down if he thinks she won't defend honestly, change to get something less than what he wanted out there to at least pass courts, have a better rollout were at least CBP were informed and could ask clarifying questions, which should not have been an issue after the leak). He would basically have to argue incompetence or that all of these things were part of a plot against him.

He waited two days after leak to do the ban--what did he do to prepare in those two days? 



Another problem with "forced hand/hail mary" defense: if that's true, why go on David Muir and confirm everything...

would have to be this: some time between 25th and 27th, Trump suddenly changed his mind and realized that he had to implement the EO immediately to stop the bad dudes

then, apparently later, he decided that this wasn't such a big deal after all since "vetting tougher than ever before" (Sheriffs interview, says better vetting plan to fight in court)

so the defense is that Trump is an idiot


so can conclude I think pretty soundly that that Trump never cared about the "bad dudes thing:"

announced during campaign

confirmed leaks on david Muir

pins it all on Kelly who says he wasn't even involved

takes time to defend original ban in court, a month to bring in later ban

explains decision to fight in court that he decided we have "more extreme vetting" procedures now, has decided its not a big deal after all


which leaves question: why did Trump do the expediated rollout in the first place?


...


https://www.npr.org/sections/thetwo-way/2017/02/05/513548211/with-trumps-travel-ban-blocked-visa-holders-refugees-scramble-to-board-flights
	With Trump's Travel Ban Blocked, Visa Holders, Refugees Scramble to Board Flights


shows that by Trump's logic, losing in court led to exactly effect he claimed he feared


...



https://www.oig.dhs.gov/file/4678/download?token=kEDXANI_
	At the ports of entry, CBP largely complied with the court orders. We found some delay and confusion as to the scope of some of the orders. For example, CBPOs in Los Angeles discovered the existence of one of the early court orders, *Darweesh v. Trump*, by watching television, but did not receive immediate guidance, so continued returning affected travelers. However, we believe that CBP at the ports of entry attempted in good faith to obey court orders. In fact, we found evidence that at some ports, CBP went to extraordinary lengths to comply . For example, at Dulles, to comply with a court order in *Aziz v. Trump*, CBP managed to recall a taxiing aircraft that was about to depart with a denied traveler on board, so she could be admitted.




https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-MA-0007-0004.pdf
	HAMEED KHALID DARWEESH, et al., Plaintiffs, - versus - DONALD TRUMP, et al., Defendants

	...MS. CHURCH: ...Your Honor, we do know of at least one junior at MIT who's been in contact with us who attempted to board a plane, I believe in London -- I've talked to a lot of people today, so I'm not totally positive about the location -- who was denied.

	...A representative of the Attorney General's Office has told us that there are families currently in Egypt who all are lawful permanent residents who are all -- local Boston residents who were all sent back and not allowed to board a plane.

	...We don't know the exact details, but we've been told that the airlines are not allowing it based on the executive order.

	...And those are my two examples. I'm tracking through national immigration lawyers thousands of examples. I mean, it's happening all over the world